Hawaii statutes.
[§128A-4] Homeland security
responsibilities. The director may:

(1) Prepare comprehensive plans and programs for
homeland security and homeland defense; provided that these plans and programs
shall be integrated and coordinated with the plans of the counties and the
federal government to the fullest possible extent;

(2) Make studies and surveys of the vulnerabilities
of critical infrastructure and key resources in this State as may be necessary,
and participate in planning for their protection;

(3) Develop and maintain a list of critical
infrastructure, coordinating the list with the counties of the State, other
state agencies, federal agencies (including the Departments of Defense and
Homeland Security), the private sector, and other agencies and organizations as
necessary;

(4) Develop and maintain a capability to process
security-clearance applications for civilian workers of the state and county
governments;

(5) Foster coordination on security matters with all
nations of the Pacific region to the extent permitted under federal law,
including but not limited to coordinating planning efforts, as appropriate;
sponsoring discussions and seminars; and hosting periodic international
conferences; and

(6) Solicit and manage funding, including but not
limited to grants from the federal government, funds from other divisions in
the department of defense and other state agencies, and funds to provide
personnel support to the office of homeland security. [L 2013, c 175, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next